Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201914-2105
Board of directors; meetings.

Regular meetings of the board of directors shall be held each calendar month at such hour and on such date as the board may designate and at such other stated times as shall be fixed in the bylaws. Special meetings of the board may be held at any time at the call of the chairperson or at the request of any two members filed in writing with the secretary. All meetings of the board, any of its committees, or committees of its employees shall be public.

Laws 1913, c. 143, § 5, p. 351;

R.S.1913, § 4247;

C.S.1922, § 3750;

C.S.1929, § 14-1006;

R.S.1943, § 14-1006;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1006;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB411, § 20.
May 18, 2019